Massachusetts, session 194th, H897.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after Section
15LLLLLL the following section:-
Section 15MMMMMM. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart
the third full week in August as Ocean Acidification Awareness Week and recommending that
the day be observed in an appropriate manner by the people, promoting citizen science initiatives
and action by the general public not only to preserve the health of the coastline but also to
generate valuable scientific data for the commonwealth.
of 7

SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 21N of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Carbon dioxide
equivalent” the following 4 definitions:-
“Coastal acidification”, the acidification of coastal waters driven by background ocean
acidification, eutrophication, freshwater inputs, atmospheric deposition and any other natural or
anthropogenic stressor.
“Coastal stressors”, eutrophication, nutrient pollution, freshwater inputs and atmospheric
deposition from the coast acidifying coastal waters.
“Coastal waters”, any waters and associated submerged lands of the ocean, including the
seabed and subsoil, lying between the coast and the seaward boundary of the commonwealth, as
defined in 43 U.S.C. 1312.
“Coastal watershed”, the Merrimack, Parker, Ipswich, North Coastal, Mystic, Neponset,
Charles, South Coastal, Cape Cod, Islands, Buzzards Bay, Taunton and Narragansett watersheds.
SECTION 3. Said section 1 of said chapter 21N, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the definition of “Entity” the following definition:-
“Eutrophication”, a condition of coastal or fresh waters having elevated nutrient
concentrations.
SECTION 4. Said section 1 of said chapter 21N, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the definition of “Nature-based solutions” the following definition:-
“Ocean acidification”, the acidification of the greater Atlantic ocean driven by
atmospheric carbon deposition independent of coastal stressors.
of 7

SECTION 5. Section 10 of said chapter 21N, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “surge”, in line 9, the following words:- , ocean and coastal acidification.
SECTION 6.. Said chapter 21N is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 12. (a) There shall be an ocean acidification council to consist of 11 members:
the secretary of energy and environmental affairs, who shall be the chair; the director of coastal
zone management or a designee; the commissioner of environmental protection or a designee;
the director of the Massachusetts environmental policy act office or a designee; the director of
marine fisheries or a designee, the director of ecological restoration or a designee; the
commissioner of agricultural resources or a designee; and 4 public members to be appointed by
the governor, 1 of whom shall be a member of a private monitoring organization in the state, 1
of whom shall be a member of the state shellfishing industry, 1 of whom shall be a scientist
specializing in coastal conservation and 1 of whom shall be a member of the Massachusetts
Municipal Association, Inc.
(b) The council shall: (i) work to further understand and take action against the threat
posed by ocean and coastal acidification; (ii) engage with and, to the extent practicable,
coordinate public and private monitoring efforts; (iii) harmonize data gathering; (iv) provide
monitoring hardware and technical training; (v) maintain a central repository for acidification
data; and (vi) recommend mitigative interventions for coastal stressors or adaptive technologies
for aquaculture, prioritizing nature-based solutions to manage stormwater and reduce nutrient
pollution. The council may direct monies from the Ocean Acidification Fund established in
section 2PPPPPP of chapter 29 to target existing programs and novel approaches to restore and
buffer marine habitats and resources impacted by acidification.
of 7

(c) Within 1 year of the council’s formation, the council shall perform and publish a gap
analysis for ocean monitoring with recommended measures for creating an appropriate spatial
and temporal resolution to model ocean acidification in coastal waters and project acidification
trends. The council shall convene a public workshop with local ocean monitoring groups to
ascertain monitoring needs and inform the analysis, and hold 2 public hearings. The analysis
shall identify appropriate monitoring technologies and select coastal waters where ocean
acidification monitoring equipment shall be placed. The ocean acidification monitoring system
shall enable modeling for long term pH changes in coastal waters and permit short-term
monitoring of aragonite saturation in variable and sensitive coastal waters to protect critical
habitat and shellfish.
(d) The council shall coordinate implementation of the ocean acidification monitoring
system, implementing the system within 3 years of the effective date of this section. The council
shall ensure that data derived from the monitoring system is publicly accessible in a standardized
format useful for public and private research.
(e) The council may commission independent studies and agency reports to fill
acidification knowledge gaps. The council shall commission the studies and reports as soon as
practicable, beginning at a later date if dependent on data derived from the ocean acidification
monitoring system described in subsection (d). The council shall avoid duplicating regional
efforts, incorporating best available science with data from the ocean acidification monitoring
system established in subsection (d) and data from local and private monitoring efforts where
available. These efforts shall include, but shall not be limited to:
of 7

(i) modeling ocean and coastal acidification trends in coastal waters and project
acidification trends;
(ii) studying the effects of acidification on marine species that are ecologically or
economically important or understudied. The study shall examine the impact of multimodal
stress and shall include, at minimum, a study of acidification effects on the American lobster,
Eastern oyster, sea scallops, quahogs and fin fish;
(iii) clarifying the causal relationship between nutrient pollution, eutrophication and
coastal acidification in coastal waters;
(iv) determining how different coastal stressors contribute to coastal acidification;
(v) estimating the economic impacts of modeled and projected acidification on the
commonwealth’s economy;
(vi) determining if current total maximum daily loads under the Massachusetts estuaries
project are sufficient to keep acidity in Massachusetts embayments within the ranges required by
314 CMR 4.05 through 2050 and proposing changes to 314 CMR §§ 4 and 5 and total maximum
daily loads if needed, taking into account ocean and coastal acidification as particularized
stressors;
(vii) performing cost-benefit analyses of intervention strategies to determine where
pollution reductions will most efficiently resilience acidification; and
(viii) developing best adaptive practices for the shellfishing industry to use to adapt to
acidification.
of 7

(f) If the council determines that eutrophication has more than a de minimis impact on
coastal acidification in any given embayment or coastal zone, the council may implement
necessary improvements in the most efficient manner to reduce eutrophication. The council may
target funds from the Ocean Acidification Fund established in section 2PPPPPP of chapter 29 to
existing state programs or proposed municipal projects for the purposes of:
(i) financing necessary upgrades to publicly owned treatment works located in coastal
watersheds to achieve enhanced nutrient removal;
(ii) replacing septic systems in nutrient sensitive coastal watersheds with connections to
100 new or existing publicly owned treatment works, or upgrading existing systems to nitrogen-
101 reducing systems; and
102 (iii) implementing other appropriate measures, including but not limited to installing
103 permeable reactive barriers and funding salt marsh restoration.
104 SECTION 7. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
105 section 2OOOOOO, as inserted by section 13 of chapter 358 of the acts of 2020, the following
106 section:-
107 Section 2PPPPPP. (a) There shall be established and set upon the books of the
108 commonwealth a separate fund to be known as the Ocean Acidification Fund. The ocean
109 acidification council shall administer the fund. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the
110 contrary, there shall be credited to the fund any revenue subject to appropriations or other money
111 authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund and any
112 gifts, grants, private contributions, investment income earned by the fund's assets and any
113 designated funds from other sources. No expenditures from the fund shall cause the fund to be in
of 7

114 deficiency at the close of the fiscal year. Any money in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall
115 not revert to the General Fund, shall be available for expenditure in the subsequent year and shall
116 not be subject to section 5C.
117 (b) Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, for the
118 purposes of restoring and buffering marine habitats and resources impacted by acidification and
119 financing infrastructure improvements to reduce eutrophication as provided in section 12 of
120 chapter 21N.
121 SECTION 8. Section 61 of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
122 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “rise”, in line 16, the following
123 words:- and coastal ocean acidification.
of 7